Utah statutes.
76-9-904.   Failure to disperse -- Penalties.

(1) (a)  Failure to comply with an order issued under Subsection 76-9-903(1)(b) to disperse is a class B misdemeanor of failure to disperse.

(b)  Any second and subsequent violation of Subsection (1)(a) is a class B misdemeanor of failure to disperse and is subject to a fine of not less than $100, unless the court finds mitigating circumstances justifying a lesser punishment and makes that finding a part of the court record.

(2) (a)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor of subsequent failure to disperse who:

(i)  is present in a public place with or as part of a group of two or more persons, and that group includes one or more persons a peace officer reasonably believes to be a member of a criminal street gang; and

(ii)  is within sight or hearing of a location where a law enforcement officer issued an order to the person to disperse under Section 76-9-903 within the prior eight hours.

(b)  A violation of Subsection (2)(a) is subject to a fine of not less than $100, unless the court finds mitigating circumstances justifying a lesser punishment and makes that finding a part of the court record.

